California, session 20252026, SB1359.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Natural Gas Ratepayer Protection Act.SEC. 2.(a)The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1)California has binding statutory obligations to reduce greenhouse gas emissions pursuant to Senate Bill 32 of the 2015–16 Regular Session (Chapter 249 of the Statutes of 2016) and subsequent statutes.(2)California’s natural gas distribution system is experiencing structural load decline due to building electrification, energy efficiency improvements, and climate policy.(3)Continued capital investment in natural gas infrastructure under conditions of declining demand creates significant risk of stranded assets and escalating costs for ratepayers.(4)Electrification of buildings is widely recognized as the lowest cost and lowest emission pathway for providing space heating, water heating, and cooking services.(5)The state must establish a managed transition of the natural gas distribution system, ensuring that financial risks associated with declining natural gas use are appropriately borne by utility shareholders rather than ratepayers.(6)The Public Utilities Commission is currently undertaking a long-term gas planning rulemaking process (commission Rulemaking R.24-09-012) to examine how to facilitate gas decarbonization while supporting equity, safety, affordability, and reliability.(b)It is the intent of the Legislature to direct the Public Utilities Commission to prioritize electrification and nonpipeline alternatives, ensure prudent depreciation of natural gas infrastructure, ensure a just transition for workers, and facilitate the orderly retirement of portions of the natural gas system.SEC. 3.SEC. 2. The heading of Article 1 (commencing with Section 328) is added to Chapter 2.2 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, to read: Article 1. General ProvisionsSEC. 4.SEC. 3. Article 2 (commencing with Section 329) is added to Chapter 2.2 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, to read: Article 2. Natural Gas Transition329. (a) Each gas corporation shall submit an annual report to the commission that describes its expenditures, during the pendency of its current general rate case cycle, associated with gas distribution infrastructure replacement and upgrade projects and includes all of the following:(1) Planned and forecasted expenditures for each gas distribution infrastructure replacement and upgrade project.(2) The status of gas distribution infrastructure replacement and upgrade projects planned, initiated, completed, deferred, or canceled since the gas corporation’s most recent general rate case decision.(3) The estimated remaining costs and projected completion dates for ongoing gas distribution infrastructure replacement and upgrade projects.(4) Any expenditures recorded in any catastrophic event memorandum account, wildfire memorandum account, or other memorandum or balancing account used to recover costs associated with wildfire response, recovery, or gas distribution system restoration.(5) Any material changes in projected customer counts, projected gas throughput, or other assumptions used to justify the gas distribution infrastructure replacement and upgrade projects, including an assessment of stranded asset risk.(6) Available electrification and nonpipeline alternatives.(b) The commission may require the report required pursuant to subdivision (a) to be submitted in a format that facilitates public review and comparison of authorized and actual expenditures.329.1. (a) (1) Before authorizing recovery of costs associated with a gas distribution infrastructure replacement and upgrade project, the commission shall consider whether cost-effective electrification alternatives or nonpipeline alternatives could reasonably avoid or reduce those costs.(2) As part of its long-term gas planning rulemaking or in a successor proceeding, the commission shall adopt rules implementing this requirement, including a reasonable cost threshold below which this requirement shall not apply.(b) The commission shall evaluate whether depreciation schedules for gas distribution infrastructure replacement and upgrade projects appropriately reflect projected reductions in gas demand and consider alternative depreciation methodologies that minimize future ratepayer exposure to stranded asset costs.(c) Nothing in this section shall delay or disallow recovery of prudently incurred costs required for the safety, reliability, or legal compliance of gas distribution infrastructure, or for emergency or catastrophic event response.SEC. 5.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.